District of Columbia statutes.
28-5202

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Combination packages” shall mean a package intended for retail sale, containing 2 or more individual packages or units of dissimilar commodities.

(2)

“Commodity” shall mean any food, drug, cosmetic, or other article, product, or commodity of any kind or class that is:

(A)

Customarily produced for sale at retail for consumption by individuals for purposes of personal care or in the performance of services ordinarily performed in or around the household; and

(B)

Usually consumed or expended in the course of that use or performance other than by wear or deterioration from use.

(3)

“Person” shall mean both plural and the singular and includes individuals, partnerships, corporations, companies, societies, and associations.

(4)

“Unit price” or “unit pricing” shall mean the retail price of an item expressed in dollars and cents per unit.

(5)

“Variety packages” shall mean a package intended for retail sale, containing 2 or more individual packages or units of similar, but not identical, commodities. Commodities that are generically the same, but that differ in weight, measure, volume, appearance, or quality, are considered similar but not identical.

Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-282, § 2(c), 60 DCR 2132